pt-BR: Material de telha/bloco: Asfalto; Madeira de cedro; Argila; Composto; Concreto; Metal; Borracha; Ardósia; Outro
es: Material de las tejas/baldosas: Asfalto; Madera de cedro; Arcilla; Compuesto; Hormigón; Metal; Goma; Pizarra; Otros
en: Shingle/Tile material: Asphalt; Cedar wood; Clay; Composite; Concrete; Metal; Rubber; Slate; Other
ja: ページずらし/タイル材質: アスファルト; 杉材; クレイ; 複合; コンクリート; 金属; ゴム; 粘板岩; その他
hu: Zsindely/cserép anyaga: Aszfalt; Cédrusfa; Agyag; Kompozit; Beton; Fém; Gumi; Pala; Egyéb
ro-RO: Material șindrilă/țiglă: Asfalt; Lemn de cedru; Lut; Compozit; Beton; Metal; Cauciuc; Ardezie; Altele
fr: Matériau du bardeau/de la tuile: Asphalt; bois de cèdre; Argile; Composite; Béton; Métal; Caoutchouc; Ardoise; Autre
nl: Materiaal dakspaan/tegels: Asfalt; Cederhout; Klei; Composiet; Beton; Metaal; Rubber; Leisteen; Andere
bg-BG: Материал на летви/плочки: Асфалт; Кедрова дървесина; Глина; Композит; Бетон; Метал; Каучук; Шист; Други
hr-HR: Materijal šindre/crijepa: Asfalt; Cedrovina; Glina; Kompozit; Beton; Metal; Guma; Škriljevac; Ostalo
zh-TW: 木瓦/瓷磚材質: 瀝青; 雪松木; 陶土; 複合; 實心; 金屬; 橡膠; 石板; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál šindľov/dlaždíc: Asfalt; Cédrové drevo; Hlina; Kompozit; Betón; Kov; Guma; Bridlica; Iné
fi: Paanu-/laattamateriaali: Asfaltti; Seetripuu; Savi; Komposiitti; Betoni; Metalli; Kumi; Liuskekivi; Muu
vi: Vật liệu lợp/ngói: Nhựa đường; Gỗ tuyết tùng; Đất sét; Tổng hợp; Bê tông; Kim loại; Cao su; Đá bảng; Khác
de: Schindel-/Fliesenmaterial: Asphalt; Zedernholz; Ton; Zusammengesetzt; Beton; Metall; Gummi; Schiefer; Sonstiges
it: Materiale scandole/piastrelle: Asfalto; Legno di cedro; Argilla; Composito; Calcestruzzo; Metallo; Gomma; Ardesia; Altro
zh-CN: 木瓦/瓦片材质: 沥青; 雪松木; 粘土; 复合材料; 混凝土; 金属; 橡胶; 石板; 其他
el: Υλικό πλακιδίων στέγης/κεραμιδιών: Ασφάλτος; Ξύλο κέδρου; Πηλός; Σύνθετο υλικό; Σκυρόδεμα; Μέταλλο; Καουτσούκ; Σχιστόλιθος; Άλλο
sv: Shingel/panna - material: Asfalt; Cederträ; Lera; Sammansatt; Betong; Metall; Gummi; Skiffer; Övrigt
sl-SI: Material za skodle/ploščice: Asfalt; Cedrov les; Glina; Kompozit; Beton; Kovina; Guma; Skrilavec; Drugo
tr: Kiremit / Fayans malzemesi: Asfalt; Sedir ağacı; Kil; Kompozit; Beton; Metal; Kauçuk; Slate; Diğer
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำแผ่นมุงหลังคา/กระเบื้อง: ยางมะตอย; ไม้สนซีดาร์; ดินเหนียว; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; คอนกรีต; โลหะ; ยาง; หินชนวน; อื่นๆ
ko: 지붕널/타일 소재: 아스팔트; 삼나무; 클레이; 복합물; 콘크리트; 금속; 고무; 슬레이트; 기타
lt-LT: Čerpių / plytelių medžiaga: Asfaltas; Kedro mediena; Molis; Kompozitas; Betonas; Metalas; Kaučiukas; Šiferis; Kita
nb: Singel-/flismateriale: Asfalt; Sedertre; Leire; Kompositt; Betong; Metall; Gummi; Skifer; Annet
da: Tagspån-/flisemateriale: Asfalt; Cedertræ; Ler; Komposit; Beton; Metal; Gummi; Skifer; Andet
cs: Materiál šindel/dlaždice: Asfalt; Cedrové dřevo; Plastelína; Kompozitní; Beton; Kov; Guma; Břidlice; Jiné
pl: Materiał kafelków/gontów: Asfalt; Drewno cedrowe; Gliniana; Kompozyt; Beton; Metal; Guma; Łupek; Inne
ru: Материал черепицы/плитки: Асфальт; Кедр; Глина; Композит; Бетон; Металл; Резина; Аспидный сланец; Другое
pt-PT: Material de telha/ladrilho: Asfalto; Madeira de cedro; Argila; Composto; Betão; Metal; Borracha; Ardósia; Outro